New York, session 2025-2026, S5279.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 236 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 236. Bulk purchases of firearms or ammunition. In addition to the 4 requirements of the statewide license and record database outlined in 5 section 400.02 of the penal law, the superintendent shall establish and 6 maintain within the division a central repository of information regard- 7 ing firearms or ammunition purchased in bulk which requires further 8 review. For the purposes of this section, the term "firearms or ammuni- 9 tion purchased in bulk" shall refer to unusually large purchases of 10 firearms, rifles, shotguns, or ammunition, as determined by the super- 11 intendent. The superintendent shall adopt and promulgate any necessary 12 rules and regulations prescribing reporting procedures for any purchases 13 of firearms or ammunition purchased in bulk by credit card, debit card, 14 PayPal, e-wallet, e-check, Lyra or any other payment system, including 15 the form for reporting such information. The superintendent shall adopt 16 and promulgate any necessary rules and regulations prescribing the 17 review of information contained in the central repository created by 18 this section for the purpose of investigating potential criminal activ- 19 ity. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10005-01-5